lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8667 Y 2
SFX 8667 ėti ėti/548 . 349
SFX 8667 ėtis ėtis/548 . 349

SFX 8668 Y 2
SFX 8668 ėti ėti/549 . 349
SFX 8668 ėtis ėtis/549 . 349

SFX 8669 Y 2
SFX 8669 ėti ėti/550 . 349
SFX 8669 ėtis ėtis/550 . 349

SFX 8670 Y 2
SFX 8670 ėti ėti/551 . 349
SFX 8670 ėtis ėtis/551 . 349

SFX 8671 Y 2
SFX 8671 ėti ėti/552 . 349
SFX 8671 ėtis ėtis/552 . 349

SFX 8672 Y 2
SFX 8672 ėti ėti/553 . 349
SFX 8672 ėtis ėtis/553 . 349

SFX 8683 Y 2
SFX 8683 ėti eda/554 . 350
SFX 8683 ėtis edasi/554 . 350

SFX 8684 Y 2
SFX 8684 ėti eda/555 . 350
SFX 8684 ėtis edasi/555 . 350

SFX 8685 Y 2
SFX 8685 ėti eda/556 . 350
SFX 8685 ėtis edasi/556 . 350

SFX 8686 Y 2
SFX 8686 ėti eda/557 . 350
SFX 8686 ėtis edasi/557 . 350

SFX 8687 Y 2
SFX 8687 ėti eda/558 . 350
SFX 8687 ėtis edasi/558 . 350

SFX 8688 Y 2
SFX 8688 ėti eda/559 . 350
SFX 8688 ėtis edasi/559 . 350

SFX 8689 Y 2
SFX 8689 ėti eda/560 . 350
SFX 8689 ėtis edasi/560 . 350

SFX 8690 Y 2
SFX 8690 ėti eda/561 . 350
SFX 8690 ėtis edasi/561 . 350

SFX 8691 Y 2
SFX 8691 ėti eda/562 . 350
SFX 8691 ėtis edasi/562 . 350

SFX 8701 Y 1
SFX 8701 ėti edie/563 . 350

SFX 8702 Y 1
SFX 8702 ėtis edie/564 . 350

SFX 8703 Y 2
SFX 8703 ėti ėjo/565 . 351
SFX 8703 ėtis ėjosi/565 . 351

SFX 8704 Y 2
SFX 8704 ėti ėjo/566 . 351
SFX 8704 ėtis ėjosi/566 . 351

SFX 8705 Y 2
SFX 8705 ėti ėjo/567 . 351
SFX 8705 ėtis ėjosi/567 . 351

SFX 8709 Y 2
SFX 8709 imti imti/544 . 349
SFX 8709 imtis imtis/544 . 349

SFX 8710 Y 2
SFX 8710 imti imti/545 . 349
SFX 8710 imtis imtis/545 . 349

SFX 8711 Y 2
SFX 8711 imti imti/546 . 349
SFX 8711 imtis imtis/546 . 349

SFX 8712 Y 2
SFX 8712 imti imti/547 . 349
SFX 8712 imtis imtis/547 . 349

SFX 8713 Y 2
SFX 8713 imti imti/548 . 349
SFX 8713 imtis imtis/548 . 349

SFX 8714 Y 2
SFX 8714 imti imti/549 . 349
SFX 8714 imtis imtis/549 . 349

SFX 8715 Y 2
SFX 8715 imti imti/550 . 349
SFX 8715 imtis imtis/550 . 349

SFX 8716 Y 2
SFX 8716 imti imti/551 . 349
SFX 8716 imtis imtis/551 . 349

SFX 8717 Y 2
SFX 8717 imti imti/552 . 349
SFX 8717 imtis imtis/552 . 349

SFX 8718 Y 2
SFX 8718 imti imti/553 . 349
SFX 8718 imtis imtis/553 . 349

SFX 8729 Y 2
SFX 8729 imti ima/554 . 350
SFX 8729 imtis imasi/554 . 350

SFX 8730 Y 2
SFX 8730 imti ima/555 . 350
SFX 8730 imtis imasi/555 . 350

SFX 8731 Y 2
SFX 8731 imti ima/556 . 350
SFX 8731 imtis imasi/556 . 350

SFX 8732 Y 2
SFX 8732 imti ima/557 . 350
SFX 8732 imtis imasi/557 . 350

SFX 8733 Y 2
SFX 8733 imti ima/558 . 350
SFX 8733 imtis imasi/558 . 350

SFX 8734 Y 2
SFX 8734 imti ima/559 . 350
SFX 8734 imtis imasi/559 . 350

SFX 8735 Y 2
SFX 8735 imti ima/560 . 350
SFX 8735 imtis imasi/560 . 350

SFX 8736 Y 2
SFX 8736 imti ima/561 . 350
SFX 8736 imtis imasi/561 . 350

SFX 8737 Y 2
SFX 8737 imti ima/562 . 350
SFX 8737 imtis imasi/562 . 350

SFX 8747 Y 1
SFX 8747 imti imie/563 . 350

SFX 8748 Y 1
SFX 8748 imtis imie/564 . 350

SFX 8749 Y 2
SFX 8749 imti ėmė/565 . 351
SFX 8749 imtis ėmėsi/565 . 351

SFX 8750 Y 2
SFX 8750 imti ėmė/566 . 351
SFX 8750 imtis ėmėsi/566 . 351

SFX 8751 Y 2
SFX 8751 imti ėmė/567 . 351
SFX 8751 imtis ėmėsi/567 . 351

SFX 8755 Y 2
SFX 8755 uti uti/544 . 349
SFX 8755 utis utis/544 . 349

SFX 8756 Y 2
SFX 8756 uti uti/545 . 349
SFX 8756 utis utis/545 . 349

SFX 8757 Y 2
SFX 8757 uti uti/546 . 349
SFX 8757 utis utis/546 . 349

SFX 8758 Y 2
SFX 8758 uti uti/547 . 349
SFX 8758 utis utis/547 . 349

SFX 8759 Y 2
SFX 8759 uti uti/548 . 349
SFX 8759 utis utis/548 . 349

SFX 8760 Y 2
SFX 8760 uti uti/549 . 349
SFX 8760 utis utis/549 . 349

SFX 8761 Y 2
SFX 8761 uti uti/550 . 349
SFX 8761 utis utis/550 . 349

SFX 8762 Y 2
SFX 8762 uti uti/551 . 349
SFX 8762 utis utis/551 . 349

SFX 8763 Y 2
SFX 8763 uti uti/552 . 349
SFX 8763 utis utis/552 . 349

SFX 8764 Y 2
SFX 8764 uti uti/553 . 349
SFX 8764 utis utis/553 . 349

SFX 8775 Y 2
SFX 8775 uti una/554 . 350
SFX 8775 utis unasi/554 . 350

SFX 8776 Y 2
SFX 8776 uti una/555 . 350
SFX 8776 utis unasi/555 . 350

SFX 8777 Y 2
SFX 8777 uti una/556 . 350
SFX 8777 utis unasi/556 . 350

SFX 8778 Y 2
SFX 8778 uti una/557 . 350
SFX 8778 utis unasi/557 . 350

SFX 8779 Y 2
SFX 8779 uti una/558 . 350
SFX 8779 utis unasi/558 . 350

SFX 8780 Y 2
SFX 8780 uti una/559 . 350
SFX 8780 utis unasi/559 . 350

SFX 8781 Y 2
SFX 8781 uti una/560 . 350
SFX 8781 utis unasi/560 . 350

SFX 8782 Y 2
SFX 8782 uti una/561 . 350
SFX 8782 utis unasi/561 . 350

SFX 8783 Y 2
SFX 8783 uti una/562 . 350
SFX 8783 utis unasi/562 . 350

SFX 8793 Y 1
SFX 8793 uti unie/563 . 350

SFX 8794 Y 1
SFX 8794 utis unie/564 . 350

SFX 8795 Y 2
SFX 8795 uti vo/565 . 351
SFX 8795 utis vosi/565 . 351

SFX 8796 Y 2
SFX 8796 uti vo/566 . 351
SFX 8796 utis vosi/566 . 351

SFX 8797 Y 2
SFX 8797 uti vo/567 . 351
SFX 8797 utis vosi/567 . 351

SFX 8801 Y 2
SFX 8801 eiti eiti/544 . 349
SFX 8801 eitis eitis/544 . 349

SFX 8802 Y 2
SFX 8802 eiti eiti/545 . 349
SFX 8802 eitis eitis/545 . 349

SFX 8803 Y 2
SFX 8803 eiti eiti/546 . 349
SFX 8803 eitis eitis/546 . 349

SFX 8804 Y 2
SFX 8804 eiti eiti/547 . 349
SFX 8804 eitis eitis/547 . 349

SFX 8805 Y 2
SFX 8805 eiti eiti/548 . 349
SFX 8805 eitis eitis/548 . 349

SFX 8806 Y 2
SFX 8806 eiti eiti/549 . 349
SFX 8806 eitis eitis/549 . 349

SFX 8807 Y 2
SFX 8807 eiti eiti/550 . 349
SFX 8807 eitis eitis/550 . 349

SFX 8808 Y 2
SFX 8808 eiti eiti/551 . 349
SFX 8808 eitis eitis/551 . 349

SFX 8809 Y 2
SFX 8809 eiti eiti/552 . 349
SFX 8809 eitis eitis/552 . 349

SFX 8810 Y 2
SFX 8810 eiti eiti/553 . 349
SFX 8810 eitis eitis/553 . 349

SFX 8821 Y 2
SFX 8821 eiti eina/554 . 350
SFX 8821 eitis einasi/554 . 350

SFX 8822 Y 2
SFX 8822 eiti eina/555 . 350
SFX 8822 eitis einasi/555 . 350

SFX 8823 Y 2
SFX 8823 eiti eina/556 . 350
SFX 8823 eitis einasi/556 . 350

SFX 8824 Y 2
SFX 8824 eiti eina/557 . 350
SFX 8824 eitis einasi/557 . 350

SFX 8825 Y 2
SFX 8825 eiti eina/558 . 350
SFX 8825 eitis einasi/558 . 350

SFX 8826 Y 2
SFX 8826 eiti eina/559 . 350
SFX 8826 eitis einasi/559 . 350

SFX 8827 Y 2
SFX 8827 eiti eina/560 . 350
SFX 8827 eitis einasi/560 . 350

SFX 8828 Y 2
SFX 8828 eiti eina/561 . 350
SFX 8828 eitis einasi/561 . 350

SFX 8829 Y 2
SFX 8829 eiti eina/562 . 350
SFX 8829 eitis einasi/562 . 350

SFX 8839 Y 1
SFX 8839 eiti einie/563 . 350

SFX 8840 Y 1
SFX 8840 eitis einie/564 . 350

SFX 8841 Y 2
SFX 8841 eiti ėjo/565 . 351
SFX 8841 eitis ėjosi/565 . 351

SFX 8842 Y 2
SFX 8842 eiti ėjo/566 . 351
SFX 8842 eitis ėjosi/566 . 351

SFX 8843 Y 2
SFX 8843 eiti ėjo/567 . 351
SFX 8843 eitis ėjosi/567 . 351

SFX 8847 Y 1
SFX 8847 eiti eiti/544 . 349

SFX 8848 Y 1
SFX 8848 eiti eiti/545 . 349

SFX 8849 Y 1
SFX 8849 eiti eiti/546 . 349

SFX 8850 Y 1
SFX 8850 eiti eiti/547 . 349

SFX 8851 Y 1
SFX 8851 eiti eiti/548 . 349

SFX 8852 Y 1
SFX 8852 eiti eiti/549 . 349

SFX 8853 Y 1
SFX 8853 eiti eiti/550 . 349

SFX 8854 Y 1
SFX 8854 eiti eiti/551 . 349

SFX 8855 Y 1
SFX 8855 eiti eiti/552 . 349

SFX 8856 Y 1
SFX 8856 eiti eiti/553 . 349

SFX 8857 Y 1
SFX 8857 eiti eiti/576 . 349

SFX 8858 Y 1
SFX 8858 eiti eina/554 . 350

SFX 8859 Y 1
SFX 8859 eiti eina/555 . 350

SFX 8860 Y 1
SFX 8860 eiti eina/556 . 350

SFX 8861 Y 1
SFX 8861 eiti eina/557 . 350

SFX 8862 Y 1
SFX 8862 eiti eina/558 . 350

SFX 8863 Y 1
SFX 8863 eiti eina/559 . 350

SFX 8864 Y 1
SFX 8864 eiti eina/560 . 350

SFX 8865 Y 1
SFX 8865 eiti eina/561 . 350

SFX 8866 Y 1
SFX 8866 eiti eina/562 . 350

SFX 8867 Y 1
SFX 8867 eiti einie/563 . 350

SFX 8868 Y 1
SFX 8868 eiti ėjo/565 . 351

SFX 8869 Y 1
SFX 8869 eiti ėjo/566 . 351

SFX 8870 Y 1
SFX 8870 eiti ėjo/567 . 351

SFX 8871 Y 2
SFX 8871 ėbti ėbti/544 . 349
SFX 8871 ėbtis ėbtis/544 . 349

SFX 8872 Y 2
SFX 8872 ėbti ėbti/545 . 349
SFX 8872 ėbtis ėbtis/545 . 349

SFX 8873 Y 2
SFX 8873 ėbti ėbti/546 . 349
SFX 8873 ėbtis ėbtis/546 . 349

SFX 8874 Y 2
SFX 8874 ėbti ėbti/547 . 349
SFX 8874 ėbtis ėbtis/547 . 349

SFX 8875 Y 2
SFX 8875 ėbti ėbti/548 . 349
SFX 8875 ėbtis ėbtis/548 . 349

SFX 8876 Y 2
SFX 8876 ėbti ėbti/549 . 349
SFX 8876 ėbtis ėbtis/549 . 349

SFX 8877 Y 2
SFX 8877 ėbti ėbti/550 . 349
SFX 8877 ėbtis ėbtis/550 . 349

AF 8871,8872,8891,8911,65521 # 133
AF 8663,8664,8683,8703,65521 # 138
AF 8801,8802,8821,8841,65521 # 140
AF 8755,8756,8775,8795,65521 # 141
AF 8709,8710,8729,8749,65521 # 159
AF 8801,8802,8821,8839,8840,8841,65521 # 229
AF 8847,8848,8857,8858,8867,8868,65521 # 334
AF 8709,8710,8714,8716,8718,8729,8733,8735,8737,8747,8748,8749,8751,65521 # 358
AF 8709,8710,8714,8729,8733,8749,65521 # 445
AF 8709,8710,8729,8747,8748,8749,65521 # 465
AF 8709,8710,8711,8714,8729,8730,8733,8749,65521 # 484
