lt_LT.dic
ateiti/229	12
atgauti/141	12
atidėti/138	12
atimti/159	12
atsidrėbti/133	14
beateiti/140	12
beatgauti/141	12
bedėti/138	12
begauti/141	12
beišeiti/140	12
bepaeiti/140	12
bepradėti/138	12
bepridėti/138	12
bepriimti/159	12
besugauti/141	12
beužimti/159	12
drėbti/133	12
drėbtis/133	14
dėti/138	12
eiti/334	12
gautis/141	14
imti/358	12
išdrėbti/133	12
išdėti/138	12
išsidrėbti/133	14
išsieiti/140	14
išsigauti/141	14
išsisrėbti/133	14
neapdrėbti/133	34
neapimti/159	34
neapsidėti/138	35
neapsigauti/141	35
neatsidėti/138	35
neatsieiti/140	35
neatsigauti/141	35
nebeapimti/159	34
nebeapsigauti/141	35
nebeatsieiti/140	35
nebeatsigauti/141	35
nebeimti/159	34
nebeišgauti/141	34
nebenueiti/140	34
nebepadėti/138	34
nebepagauti/141	34
nebepaimti/159	34
nebepraeiti/140	34
nebepridėti/138	34
nebeprisiimti/159	35
nebesrėbti/133	34
nebesusidėti/138	35
nebeužeiti/140	34
nebeužgauti/141	34
nebeužsiimti/159	35
nedėti/138	34
neišdrėbti/133	34
neišeiti/140	34
neišsrėbti/133	34
nenuimti/159	34
nenusidrėbti/133	35
nenusigauti/141	35
nepadėti/138	34
nepereiti/140	34
neperimti/159	34
neprasidėti/138	35
nepridrėbti/133	34
nepriimti/445	34
neprisieiti/140	35
neprisigauti/141	35
neprisiimti/159	35
nesudėti/138	34
nesusrėbti/133	34
neužeiti/140	34
neužgauti/141	34
neužimti/159	34
neįdrėbti/133	34
neįdėti/138	34
nusidrėbti/133	14
padėti/138	12
pagauti/141	12
paimti/159	12
pareiti/140	12
pasiimti/465	14
pasisrėbti/133	14
pradėti/138	12
praimti/159	12
pridrėbti/133	12
prieiti/140	12
prigauti/141	12
priimti/484	12
prisrėbti/133	12
srėbtis/133	14
sudėti/138	12
susiimti/159	14
susrėbti/133	12
teapeiti/140	12
teatgauti/141	12
tebeatimti/159	12
tebeeiti/140	12
tebepadėti/138	12
tebeužimti/159	12
tebeįeiti/140	12
tegauti/141	12
teneapimti/159	34
teneišeiti/140	34
teneužsigauti/141	35
tepaeiti/140	12
tepasiimti/159	14
teperdėti/138	12
teprieiti/140	12
teprisidėti/138	14
tesuimti/159	12
teuždėti/138	12
teužgauti/141	12
uždrėbti/133	12
užeiti/140	12
užsidėti/138	14
užsiimti/159	14
užsrėbti/133	12
įsidrėbti/133	14
įsigauti/141	14
